Maryland, session 2026, HB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE ACADEMIC ELIGIBILITY OF
A PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENT TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
SCHOOL FROM:
(I) SUSPENDING OR EXPELLING A STUDENT; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1275*

HOUSE BILL 1275
(II) PROHIBITING STUDENT PARTICIPATION IN
INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS DUE TO A VIOLATION OF AN ESTABLISHED
ATTENDANCE POLICY.
(B) (1) THE STANDARDS OF PARTICIPATION FOR STUDENT
PARTICIPATION IN INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY
BOARD SHALL INCLUDE A PROCESS FOR A STUDENT TO APPEAL A PUBLIC SCHOOL’S
DETERMINATION THAT THE STUDENT IS ACADEMICALLY INELIGIBLE TO
PARTICIPATE.
(2) AN APPEAL PROCESS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AN INTERNAL SCHOOL PROCESS TO APPEAL A
DETERMINATION OF ACADEMIC INELIGIBILITY, INCLUDING A HEARING;
(II) WRITTEN NOTICE OF:
1. THE DETERMINATION AND THE BASIS FOR THE
DETERMINATION;
2. THE PROCESS FOR AN INTERNAL SCHOOL APPEAL,
INCLUDING RELEVANT TIMELINES AND DEADLINES; AND
3. THE EARLIEST AVAILABLE HEARING DATE AND TIME;
AND
(III) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE OF A STUDENT’S INTENT TO
APPEAL, A PROVISIONAL ELIGIBILITY PERIOD UNTIL THE EARLIER OF:
1. THE CONCLUSION OF THE INTERNAL SCHOOL
APPEAL; OR
2. 10 SCHOOL DAYS.
(C) DURING A PROVISIONAL ELIGIBILITY PERIOD OF THE APPEALS
PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A STUDENT:
(1) MAY PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS, INCLUDING
PRACTICE AND COMPETITION; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AN INELIGIBLE STUDENT FOR
PURPOSES OF INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS RULES OR REGULATIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1275 3
(D) IF A PUBLIC SCHOOL UPHOLDS A DETERMINATION OF ACADEMIC
INELIGIBILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS AFTER AN
APPEAL, THE STUDENT’S ACADEMIC INELIGIBILITY SHALL TAKE EFFECT THE NEXT
SCHOOL DAY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.